Idaho, session 2026, S1437.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Police for the Forensic
Services Program $63,000 from the General Fund to be expended for operating
expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.